Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB860.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 443.6(g) of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 443.6. Reimbursement for Certain Medical Assistance Items and Services.--* * *(g) The department shall establish a benefit [packages] package for [dental and] pharmacy services for medical assistance recipients twenty-one years of age or older, and any exceptions to [such] the benefit [packages] package as the department determines are appropriate. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including this section, during State fiscal year 2011-2012, the department shall establish such benefit 12345678910111213141516171819 [packages] package, limits and exceptions thereto by publication of one or more notices in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. A notice shall describe the available benefit [packages] package or limits and any exceptions thereto. The benefit [packages] package, limits and exceptions thereto shall take effect as specified in the notice and remain in effect until changed by a subsequent notice issued on or before June 30, 2012, or thereafter by department regulation.(h) The department shall establish a benefit package for dental services for medical assistance recipients twenty-one years of age or older. During State fiscal year 2025-2026, the department shall establish the benefit package by publication of one or more notices in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. A notice shall describe the available benefit package. The benefit package shall take effect as specified in the notice and remain in effect until changed by department regulation. The department shall seek a State plan amendment or Federal waiver from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, if needed, to allow the medical assistance program to provide coverage for dental services in accordance with this section. The benefit package under this subsection:(1) shall include all coverages for dental services provided prior to the dental benefit package changes announced under 41 Pa.B. 5133 (September 24, 2011);(2) may not remove any existing coverage for dental services or include a benefit limitation for covered dental services; and(3) may include additional coverages for dental services beyond those currently provided and those provided prior to the dental benefit package changes announced under 41 Pa.B. 5133 (September 24, 2011).20250SB0860PN0954 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. All regulations and parts of regulations are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with this act.Section 3. If a Federal waiver under section 443.6(h) of the act or a State plan amendment is approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the Secretary of Human Services shall transmit notice of the approval to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 4. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) Section 2 of this act shall take effect immediately following publication of the notice under section 3 of this act.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0860PN0954 - 3 - 1234567891011121314